apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.ca.dix
<pardef n="v/oler__vbmod">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldríem</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldria</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldríeu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldries</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldrien</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldria</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldrem</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldré</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldreu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldràs</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldran</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oldrà</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olent</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olent</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olguérem</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olguí</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olguéreu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olgueres</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olgueren</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olgué</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulguem</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulguem</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulgueu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulgueu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulgues</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulgues</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulguin</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ulguen</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulguin</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ulguen</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulgui</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ulga</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulgui</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ulga</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oler</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oler</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olíem</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olia</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olíeu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olies</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olien</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olia</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olguéssim</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olguérem</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olgués</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olguera</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olguéssiu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olguéreu</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olguessis</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olgueres</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olguessin</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olgueren</l>
          <r>oler<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      

<e lm="voler"><i>v</i><par n="v/oler__vbmod"/></e>
